Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB771.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 505(b)(1), (2), (2.2), (2.3) and (2.4) of Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes are amended to read:§ 505. Use of force in self-protection.* * *(b) Limitations on justifying necessity for use of force.--(1) The use of force is not justifiable under this section:(i) to resist an arrest which the actor knows is being made by a peace officer, although the arrest is unlawful; [or](ii) to resist force used by the occupier or possessor of property or by another person on his behalf, 12345678910111213141516171819 where the actor knows that the person using the force is doing so under a claim of right to protect the property, except that this limitation shall not apply if:(A) the actor is a public officer acting in the performance of his duties or a person lawfully assisting him therein or a person making or assisting in a lawful arrest;(B) the actor has been unlawfully dispossessed of the property and is making a reentry or recaption justified by section 507 of this title (relating to use of force for the protection of property); or(C) the actor believes that such force is necessary to protect himself against death or serious bodily injury[.]; or(iii) if the actor knows that he can avoid the necessity of using force with complete safety by deescalation or retreating.(2) The use of deadly force is not justifiable under this section unless the actor believes that such force is necessary to protect himself against death, serious bodily injury, kidnapping or sexual intercourse compelled by force or threat; nor is it justifiable if:(i) the actor, with the intent of causing death or serious bodily injury, provoked the use of force against himself in the same encounter; or(ii) the actor knows that he can avoid the necessity of using such force with complete safety by deescalation or retreating.[, except the actor is not obliged to retreat from his dwelling or place of work, unless he was the initial aggressor or is assailed in his place of work 20250SB0771PN0825 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 by another person whose place of work the actor knows it to be.]* * *(2.2) The presumption set forth in paragraph (2.1) does not apply if:(i) the person against whom the force is used has the right to be in or is a lawful resident of the dwelling, residence or vehicle, such as an owner or lessee;(ii) the person sought to be removed is a child or grandchild or is otherwise in the lawful custody or under the lawful guardianship of the person against whom the protective force is used;(iii) the actor is engaged in a criminal activity or is using the dwelling, residence or occupied vehicle to further a criminal activity; [or](iv) the person against whom the force is used is a peace officer acting in the performance of his official duties and the actor using force knew or reasonably should have known that the person was a peace officer[.]; or(v) the actor knows that he can avoid the necessity of using deadly force with complete safety by deescalation or retreating.[(2.3) An actor who is not engaged in a criminal activity, who is not in illegal possession of a firearm and who is attacked in any place where the actor would have a duty to retreat under paragraph (2)(ii) has no duty to retreat and has the right to stand his ground and use force, including deadly force, if:20250SB0771PN0825 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (i) the actor has a right to be in the place where he was attacked;(ii) the actor believes it is immediately necessary to do so to protect himself against death, serious bodily injury, kidnapping or sexual intercourse by force or threat; and(iii) the person against whom the force is used displays or otherwise uses:(A) a firearm or replica of a firearm as defined in 42 Pa.C.S. § 9712 (relating to sentences for offenses committed with firearms); or(B) any other weapon readily or apparently capable of lethal use.(2.4) The exception to the duty to retreat set forth under paragraph (2.3) does not apply if the person against whom the force is used is a peace officer acting in the performance of his official duties and the actor using force knew or reasonably should have known that the person was a peace officer.]* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0771PN0825 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021